District of Columbia statutes.
42-2812.08

Authorized delegation of authority.

To the extent permitted by District and federal laws, the Mayor may delegate to any Authorized Delegate the performance of any function authorized to be performed by the Mayor under this subchapter.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-202, § 208
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2172(c), 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2172(c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).